test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maskisin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - maskisin - ok : # -m inanimate noun, shoe
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg: maskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl: maskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Loc: maskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: maskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: maskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: maskisinisihk
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omaskisin
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: omaskisiniyiw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimaskisininân
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimaskisininaw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimaskisiniwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omaskisiniwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: omaskisiniyiw
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: omaskisina
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: omaskisiniyiwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimaskisininâna
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimaskisininawa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimaskisiniwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: omaskisiniwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: omaskisiniyiwa
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimaskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimaskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omaskisinis
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: omaskisinisiyiw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimaskisinisinân
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimaskisinisinaw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimaskisinisiwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omaskisinisiwâw
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: omaskisinisiyiw
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nimaskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kimaskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: omaskisinisa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: omaskisinisiyiwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nimaskisinisinâna
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kimaskisinisinawa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kimaskisinisiwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: omaskisinisiwâwa
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: omaskisinisiyiwa
     
     maskisin+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskisinihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: omaskisiniyihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimaskisininâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimaskisininâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimaskisiniwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: omaskisiniwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: omaskisiniyihk

     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimaskisinisihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimaskisinisihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: omaskisinisihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: omaskisinisiyihk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimaskisinisinâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimaskisinisinâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimaskisinisiwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: omaskisinisiwâhk
     maskisin+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: omaskisinisiyihk
